Vermont statutes. Title 6 Agriculture
Article IV. Powers of the Commission

§ 1808.
Powers to promote regulatory uniformity, simplicity, and interstate cooperation.

The Commission is hereby empowered to:

Investigate or provide for investigations or research projects designed to review the existing laws and regulations of the participating states, to consider their administration and costs, and to measure their impact on the production and marketing of milk and their effects on the shipment of milk and milk products within the region.

Prepare and transmit to the participating states model dairy laws and regulations dealing with the inspection of farms and plants, sanitary codes, labels for dairy products and their imitations, standards for dairy products, license standards, producer security programs, and fair trade laws.

Study and recommend to the participating states joint or cooperative programs for the administration of the dairy laws and regulations and prepare estimates of cost savings and benefits of such programs.

Encourage the harmonious relationships between the various elements in the industry for the solution of their material problems. Conduct symposiums or conferences designed to improve industry relations, or a better understanding of problems.

Prepare and release periodic reports on activities and results of the Commission’s efforts to the participating states.

Review the existing marketing system for milk and milk products and recommend changes in the existing structure for assembly and distribution of milk which may assist, improve, or promote more efficient assembly and distribution of milk.

Investigate costs and charges for producing, hauling, handling, processing, distributing, selling and for all other services performed with respect to milk.

Examine current economic forces affecting producers, probable trends in production and consumption, the level of dairy farm prices in relation to costs, the financial conditions of dairy farmers, and the need for an emergency order to relieve critical conditions on dairy farms.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 57

, § 1, eff. June 3, 1993.

§ 1809.
Equitable farm prices.

The powers granted in this section and section 1810 shall apply only to the establishment of a compact over-order price, so long as federal milk marketing orders remain in effect in the region. In the event that any or all such orders are terminated, this article shall authorize the Commission to establish one or more Commission marketing orders, as herein provided, in the region or parts thereof as defined in the order.

A compact over-order price established pursuant to this section shall apply only to Class I milk. Such over-order price shall not exceed $1.50 per gallon. Beginning in 1990, and using that year as a base, the foregoing $1.50 per gallon maximum shall be adjusted annually by the rate of change in the Consumer Price Index as reported by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the U.S. Department of Labor. For purposes of the pooling and equalization of an over-order price, the value of milk used in other use classifications shall be calculated at the appropriate class price established pursuant to the applicable federal order or state dairy regulation and the value of unregulated milk shall be calculated in relation to the nearest prevailing class price in accordance with and subject to such adjustments as the Commission may prescribe in regulations.

A Commission marketing order shall apply to all classes and uses of milk.

The Commission is hereby empowered to establish the minimum price for milk to be paid by pool plants, partially regulated plants and all other handlers receiving milk from producers located in a regulated area. This price shall be established either as a compact over-order price or by one or more Commission marketing orders. Whenever such a price has been established by either type of regulation, the legal obligation to pay such price shall be determined solely by the terms and purpose of the regulation without regard to the situs of the transfer of title, possession, or any other factors not related to the purposes of the regulation and this compact. Producer-handlers, as defined in an applicable federal market order, shall not be subject to a compact over-order price. The Commission shall provide for similar treatment of producer-handlers under Commission marketing orders.

In determining the price, the Commission shall consider the balance between production and consumption of milk and milk products in the regulated area, the costs of production including the price of feed, the cost of labor including the reasonable value of the producer’s own labor and management, machinery expense, and interest expense, the prevailing price for milk outside the regulated area, the purchasing power of the public, and the price necessary to yield a reasonable return to the producer and distributor.

When establishing a compact over-order price, the Commission shall take such action as necessary and feasible to ensure that the over-order price does not create an incentive for producers to generate additional supplies of milk.

The Commission shall, whenever possible, enter into agreements with state or federal agencies for exchange of information or services for the purpose of reducing regulatory burden and cost of administering the compact. The Commission may reimburse other agencies for the reasonable cost of providing these services.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 57

, § 1, eff. June 3, 1993.

§ 1810.
Optional provisions for pricing order.

Regulations establishing a compact over-order price or a Commission marketing order may contain, but shall not be limited to, any of the following:

Provisions classifying milk in accordance with the form in which or purpose for which it is used, or creating a flat pricing program.

With respect to a Commission marketing order only, provisions establishing or providing a method for establishing separate minimum prices for each use classification prescribed by the Commission, or a single minimum price for milk purchased from producers or associations of producers.

With respect to an over-order minimum price, provisions establishing or providing a method for establishing such minimum price for Class I milk.

Provisions for establishing either an over-order price or a Commission marketing order may make use of any reasonable method for establishing such price or prices including flat pricing and formula pricing. Provision may also be made for location adjustments, zone differentials, and for competitive credits with respect to regulated handlers who market outside the regulated area.

Provisions for the payment to all producers and associations of producers delivering milk to all handlers of uniform prices for all milk so delivered, irrespective of the uses made of such milk by the individual handler to whom it is delivered, or for the payment of producers delivering milk to the same handler of uniform prices for all milk delivered by them.

With respect to regulations establishing a compact over-order price, the Commission may establish one equalization pool within the regulated area for the sole purpose of equalizing returns to producers throughout the regulated area.

With respect to any Commission marketing order, as defined in section 1802 of this compact, subdivision (9), which replaces one or more terminated federal orders or state dairy regulation, the marketing area of now separate state or federal orders shall not be merged without the affirmative consent of each state, voting through its delegation, which is partly or wholly included within any such new marketing area.

Provisions requiring persons who bring Class I milk into the regulated area to make compensatory payments with respect to all such milk to the extent necessary to equalize the cost of milk purchased by handlers subject to a compact over-order price or Commission marketing order. No such provisions shall discriminate against milk producers outside the regulated area. The provisions for compensatory payments may require payment of the difference between the Class I price required to be paid for such milk in the state of production by a federal milk marketing order or state dairy regulation and the Class I price established by the compact over-order price or Commission marketing order.

Provisions specially governing the pricing and pooling of milk handled by partially regulated plants.

Provisions requiring that the account of any person regulated under a compact over-order price shall be adjusted for any payments made to or received by such persons with respect to a producer settlement fund of any federal or state milk marketing order or other state dairy regulation within the regulated area.

Provisions requiring the payment by handlers of an assessment to cover the costs of the administration and enforcement of such order pursuant to Article VII, subsection 1818(a) of this chapter.

Provisions for reimbursement to participants of the Women, Infants and Children Special Supplemental Food Program of the United States Child Nutrition Act of 1966.

Other provisions and requirements as the Commission may find are necessary or appropriate to effectuate the purposes of this compact and to provide for the payment of fair and equitable minimum prices to producers.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 57

, § 1, eff. June 3, 1993.